apertium-mt-he.mt.dix
  <pardef n="mi/ja__num">
    <e><p><l>ja</l><r>ja<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>jiet</l><r>ja<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>tejn</l><r>ja<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="mitejn__num">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="miljun__num">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="XVI__num">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="el/f__num">
    <e><p><l>f</l><r>f<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uf</l><r>f<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="tieni__num"> <!-- 2nd -->
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->

  <pardef n="S__dar">
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="px2sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ha</l><r><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>na</l><r><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kom</l><r><s n="px2pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>hom</l><r><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="S__isem">
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="px2sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iha</l><r><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ina</l><r><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ikom</l><r><s n="px2pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ihom</l><r><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="S__omm">
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ok</l><r><s n="px2sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ha</l><r><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>na</l><r><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kom</l><r><s n="px2pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>hom</l><r><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="S__saqajn">
    <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>k</l><r><s n="px2sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>h</l><r><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ha</l><r><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>na</l><r><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kom</l><r><s n="px2pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>hom</l><r><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>


  <pardef n="is/em__n_m">
    <e><p><l>em</l><r>em<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>emm</l><r>em<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__isem"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>m</l><r>em<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
    <e><p><l>mijiet</l><r>em<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>mijiet</l><r>em<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="t/riq__n_f">
    <e><p><l>riq</l><r>riq<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>riqt</l><r>riq<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
    <e><p><l>oroq</l><r>riq<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>oroq</l><r>riq<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
  </pardef>


  <pardef n="d/ar__n_m">
    <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
    <e><p><l>jar</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>jar</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="ħajj/a__n_f">
    <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>it</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
    <e><p><l>iet</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iet</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="omm__n_f">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__omm"/></e>
    <e><p><l>ijiet</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ijiet</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="missi/er__n_m">
    <e><p><l>er</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>er</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
    <e><p><l>rijiet</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rijiet</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="q/alb__n_m">
    <e><p><l>alb</l><r>alb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>alb</l><r>alb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
    <e><p><l>lub</l><r>alb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>lub</l><r>alb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="ħsi/eb__n_m">
    <e><p><l>eb</l><r>eb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>eb</l><r>eb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
    <e><p><l>bijiet</l><r>eb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>bijiet</l><r>eb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="riġ/el__n_m">
    <e><p><l>el</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>el</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
    <e><p><l>lejn</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>lej</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__saqajn"/></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="s/ieq__n_m">
    <e><p><l>ieq</l><r>ieq<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ieq</l><r>ieq<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
    <e><p><l>aqajn</l><r>ieq<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>aqaj</l><r>ieq<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__saqajn"/></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="d/riegħ__n_m">
    <e><p><l>riegħ</l><r>riegħ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>riegħ</l><r>riegħ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
    <e><p><l>irgħajn</l><r>riegħ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>irgħajn</l><r>riegħ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__saqajn"/></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="id__n_f">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
    <e><p><l>ejn</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ejn</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__saqajn"/></e>
  </pardef>


  <pardef n="/belt__n_f">
    <e><p><l>belt</l><r>belt<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>belt</l><r>belt<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
    <e><p><l>ibliet</l><r>belt<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ibliet</l><r>belt<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>bliet</l><r>belt<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>bliet</l><r>belt<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="k/elma__n_f">
    <e><p><l>elma</l><r>elma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>elmt</l><r>elma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>elmiet</l><r>elma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>liem</l><r>elma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>liem</l><r>elma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__dar"/></e>
  </pardef>

    <e lm="mija" c="hundred"><i>mi</i><par n="mi/ja__num"/></e>
    <e lm="mitejn" c="two hundreds"><i>mitejn</i><par n="mitejn__num"/></e>
    <e lm="elf" c="thousand" ><i>el</i><par n="el/f__num"/></e>
    <e lm="elfejn" c="two thousands"><i>elfejn</i><par n="mitejn__num"/></e>
    <e lm="miljun" c="million"><i>miljun</i><par n="miljun__num"/></e>
    <e lm="biljun" c="billion"><i>biljun</i><par n="miljun__num"/></e>
    <e lm="triljun" c="trillion"><i>triljun</i><par n="miljun__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ewwel" c="first(?)"><i>ewwel</i><par n="tieni__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tieni" c="second"><i>tieni</i><par n="tieni__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tielet" c="third"><i>tielet</i><par n="tieni__num"/></e>
    <e lm="raba" c="fourth"><i>raba</i><par n="tieni__num"/></e>
    <e lm="hames" c="fifth"><i>hames</i><par n="tieni__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sitt" c="sixth"><i>sitt</i><par n="tieni__num"/></e>
    <e lm="seba" c="seventh"><i>seba</i><par n="tieni__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tmien" c="eighth"><i>tmien</i><par n="tieni__num"/></e>
    <e lm="disa" c="ninth"><i>disa</i><par n="tieni__num"/></e>
    <e lm="għaxar" c="tenth"><i>għaxar</i><par n="tieni__num"/></e>
    <e lm="mitt" c="hundredth"><i>mitt</i><par n="tieni__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XVI" c=""><i>XVI</i><par n="XVI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="II" c=""><i>II</i><par n="XVI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="III" c=""><i>III</i><par n="XVI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="IV" c=""><i>IV</i><par n="XVI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VI" c=""><i>VI</i><par n="XVI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XXIII" c=""><i>XXIII</i><par n="XVI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XII" c=""><i>XII</i><par n="XVI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dar" c="house"><i>d</i><par n="d/ar__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="isem"><i>is</i><par n="is/em__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="triq" c="street"><i>t</i><par n="t/riq__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="omm" c="mother"><i>omm</i><par n="omm__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ħajja" c="life"><i>ħajj</i><par n="ħajj/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sieq" c="foot"><i>s</i><par n="s/ieq__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="riġel" c="leg"><i>riġ</i><par n="riġ/el__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="id" c="hand"><i>id</i><par n="id__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="driegħ" c="arm"><i>d</i><par n="d/riegħ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="art" c="land"><i>art</i><par n="omm__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kelma" c="word"><i>k</i><par n="k/elma__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="belt" c="city"><i></i><par n="/belt__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="belt kapitali" c="capital city"><i></i><par n="/belt__n_f"/><p><l><b/>kapitali</l><r><g><b/>kapitali</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="qalb" c="heart"><i>q</i><par n="q/alb__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ħsieb"><i>ħsi</i><par n="ħsi/eb__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ħsieb"><i>ħsi</i><par n="ħsi/eb__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="missier"><i>missi</i><par n="missi/er__n_m"/></e>
